Hawaii statutes.
[§46-147] Effect on existing
ordinances. This part shall not invalidate any impact fee ordinance
existing on June 19, 1992. [L 1992, c 282, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"Part" substituted for "chapter".

"June 19, 1992" substituted for "the
effective date of this Act".

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next